Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2801
Legislative findings; act, how cited.

(1) Sections 54-2801 to 54-2805 shall be known and may be cited as the Livestock Growth Act.

(2) The Legislature finds that livestock production has traditionally served a significant role in the economic vitality of rural areas of the state and in the state's overall economy and that the growth and vitality of the state's livestock sector are critical to the continued prosperity of the state and its citizens. The Legislature further finds that a public interest exists in assisting efforts of the livestock industry and rural communities to preserve and enhance livestock development as an essential element of economic development and that a need exists to provide aid, resources, and assistance to rural communities and counties seeking opportunities in the growth of livestock production. It is the intent of the Legislature to seek reasonable means to nurture and support the livestock sector of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 754, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB175, § 1.